Washington statutes.
RCW 26.12.205

Priority for proceedings involving children.

The family court shall give proceedings involving children priority over cases without children.

[ 1991 c 367 s 16.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—Captions not law—1991 c 367: See notes following RCW 26.09.015.